Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 4 Married Women’s Rights

15-4-1.
Ownership of separate property.

The real estate, chattels real, and personal estate which are the property of any woman before marriage, or which may become the property of any woman after marriage, or which may be acquired by her own industry, including damages recovered in suits or proceedings for her benefit and compensation for her property taken for public use, and the proceeds of all such property, shall be and remain her sole and separate property free from control of her husband.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-1

.

15-4-2.
Receipt of property and release of debts by married woman.

The sole and separate receipt, order, or discharge of the wife for the payment and delivery to her, or to any person upon her order, of her own property, or the rents and profits of her property, including money on deposit in any savings bank or institution for savings, or other banking institution, and for the payment of any debt or damage to her belonging from any person or corporation, whether secured by mortgage or otherwise, shall be a sufficient discharge for it; and she may, in her own name or by her own separate deed, discharge any such mortgage or security.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-2

.

15-4-3.
Power to contract.

A married woman may make any contract the same as if she were single and unmarried, and with the same rights and liabilities.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 3; P.L. 1896, ch. 335, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-3

.

15-4-4.
Conveyance of property to or from husband or other persons.

A married woman may sell and convey directly to, or may take directly from, her husband or any other person any estate or interest in any real or personal property in the same manner and with the same effect as if she were single and unmarried. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to support any transfer made between husband and wife in fraud of creditors.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-4

.

15-4-5.
Acknowledgment of deeds and letters of attorney.

The deed of a married woman conveying her separate interest in any lands, tenements, or hereditaments shall be acknowledged by her in the same manner as if she were single and unmarried. If any deed affecting her right of life estate created by chapter 25 of title 33 in any estate of her husband during his life is executed by attorney of the wife, the letter of attorney shall be acknowledged in the same manner as if she were single and unmarried.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-5

.

15-4-6.
Release of interest.

A married woman, including a minor, may bar her right of life estate created by chapter 25 of title 33 in any estate of her husband by joining with him in the deed conveying the estate, and releasing her claim to life estate created by chapter 25 of title 33, or by releasing her right of life estate by her separate deed acknowledged in the same manner as provided in §

15-4-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 6; P.L. 1947, ch. 1914, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-6

.

15-4-7.
Testamentary power.

Any married woman of sane mind and not less than eighteen (18) years of age may dispose of her real or personal estate or any portion of her real or personal estate by last will and testament, executed in the manner in which other wills are required to be executed for disposition of like property.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-7

; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 65.

15-4-8.
Rights of spouses in real estate.

The rights of a spouse in the real estate of his or her spouse, as created by chapter 25 of title 33, shall not be impaired by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 8; P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-8

.

15-4-9.
Trade or business — Partnership with husband.

A married woman may carry on any trade or business as if she were single and unmarried; but her husband shall not be liable for her debts, contracts, or torts from that trade or business. A husband and wife may be partners in a trading or any other type of partnership.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 9; P.L. 1944, ch. 1397, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-9

.

15-4-10.
Power to act as fiduciary.

A married woman may be, give bond as, and exercise the powers: (1) of trustee, when appointed by deed; (2) of executrix, trustee, or guardian, when appointed under a will or by a court of competent jurisdiction; or (3) of administratrix or guardian, when appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction, in the same manner and with the same rights and liabilities in all respects as if she were single and unmarried, and irrespective of the time of her marriage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 11; P.L. 1902, ch. 961, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-10

.

15-4-11.
Agent for husband — Husband as agent.

The wife may act as agent or attorney of her husband, and the husband may act as the agent or attorney of his wife.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-11

.

15-4-12.
Liability for contracts or torts of husband or wife.

The husband shall not be liable by reason of the marital relation: (1) for any contract made or for any tort committed by his wife prior to their marriage; (2) for any contract made after marriage by his wife; (3) for torts committed by his wife after marriage, unless he participates in them or coerces her to do so. The wife or her property shall not be liable for the contracts or the torts of her husband.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-12

.

15-4-13.
Liability of property to attachment and levy — Liens.

The property secured to a married woman by this chapter shall be liable to attachment and levy for her debts, and to levy for judgment in any action of tort against her, as if she were single and unmarried; and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair any lien or right of lien on her property or any remedy provided by law for the enforcement of the lien.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-13

.

15-4-14.
Proceeding by or against married woman.

In all actions, suits, and proceedings by or against a married woman, she shall sue and be sued alone.

In all actions for injuries to the person, a married woman may sue in her own name and may include in the suit a claim for medical and/or hospital and/or dental expenses incurred in her behalf either in her name or that of her husband.

If the husband pays any or all of his wife’s bills, the party responsible for the injuries may reimburse him directly and will not be required to pay the bills again.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-14

; P.L. 1975, ch. 176, § 1.

15-4-15.
Effect of coverture on adverse possession cases.

In all causes of action or cases of adverse possession, no exception to the running of the statute of limitations shall be made in favor of a married woman because of her coverture.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-15

.

15-4-16.
Property of absent or imprisoned husband.

Whenever a husband has abandoned his wife and been absent from the state for the period of one year or more, or whenever the husband is condemned to imprisonment for one year or more, the wife may petition the superior court, wherever sitting, setting forth these facts. Upon satisfactory proof of these facts on hearing, after any notice that the court shall have required to be given, the court may order that the petitioner may have the rents and income of the property, both real and personal, of the absentee or party imprisoned, and the rents and income shall be applied to the support of the petitioner and their minor children until further order of the court. Control and management shall be exercised through the intervention of a trustee appointed by the court; or, if the property is less than three hundred dollars ($300) in value, the whole or any part of the property may be set over to the petitioner absolutely.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 194, § 20; C.P.A. 1905, §§ 1220, 1227; G.L. 1909, ch. 246, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 290, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 417, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

15-4-16

.

15-4-17.
Abolition of interspousal immunity.

No cause of action shall be barred on the ground that the parties are married or were married at the time that the cause of action accrued. The common-law doctrine of interspousal immunity is explicitly and totally abrogated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 124, § 1.